Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 17. Virginia Consumer Protection Act.

§ 59.1-196.
Title.

This chapter may be cited as the Virginia Consumer Protection Act of 1977.

History.
1977, c. 635.

Cross references.

As to conflicts between this Act and the Uniform Computer Information Transactions Act, see § 59.1-501.5.

For provision that violations of Article 7 (§§

32.1-212

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 32.1, relating to bedding and upholstered furniture, constitute a prohibited practice under § 59.1-200 and are subject to the enforcement provisions of §§ 59.1-196 et seq., see §

32.1-226

.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 217 (1980).

For 2000 survey of Virginia antitrust and trade regulation law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 647 (2000).

For article, “Antitrust and Trade Regulation,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 453 (2001).

For article, “Property Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 777 (2001).

For symposium, “The Boundaries of Copyright and Trademark/Consumer Protection Law: Trademarks and the Boundary of the Firm,” see 51 Wm. and Mary L. Rev. 345 (2009).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1 Extra-Judicial Procedures. § 1.02 Self Help. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 29 Consumer Actions and Products Liability. § 29.03 Statutory Consumer Actions, etc. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 8A-425 Notice of Mandatory Warranty Registration Card.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
12A M.J. Limitation of Actions, § 24.

§ 59.1-197.
Intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that this chapter shall be applied as remedial legislation to promote fair and ethical standards of dealings between suppliers and the consuming public.

History.
1977, c. 635.

§ 59.1-198.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Business opportunity” means the sale of any products, equipment, supplies or services which are sold to an individual for the purpose of enabling such individual to start a business to be operated out of his residence, but does not include a business
opportunity which is subject to the Business Opportunity Sales Act, Chapter 21 (§ 59.1-262 et seq.) of this title.

“Children’s product” means a consumer product designed or intended primarily for children 12 years of age or younger. In determining whether a consumer product is primarily intended for a child 12 years of age or younger, the following factors shall be
considered:

A statement by a manufacturer about the intended use of such product, including a label on such product if such statement is reasonable;

Whether the product is represented in its packaging, display, promotion, or advertising as appropriate for use by children 12 years of age or younger;

Whether the product is commonly recognized by consumers as being intended for use by a child 12 years of age or younger; and

The Age Determination Guidelines issued by the staff of the Consumer Products Safety Commission in September 2002, and any successor to such guidelines.“Consumer transaction” means:

Transactions involving the advertisement, sale, lease, or license, or the offering for sale, lease or license, of goods or services to a church or other religious body; and

Transactions involving the advertisement of legal services that contain information about the results of a state or federal survey, inspection, or investigation of a nursing home or certified nursing facility as described in subsection E of §

32.1-126

.“Cure offer” means a written offer of one or more things of value, including but not limited to the payment of money, that is made by a supplier and that is delivered to a person claiming to have suffered a loss
as a result of a consumer transaction or to the attorney for such person. A cure offer shall be reasonably calculated to remedy a loss claimed by the person and it shall include a minimum additional amount equaling 10 percent of
the value of the cure offer or $500, whichever is greater, as compensation for inconvenience, any attorney’s or other fees, expenses, or other costs of any kind that such person may incur in relation to such loss; provided, however
that the minimum additional amount need not exceed $4,000.“Defective drywall” means drywall, or similar building material composed of dried gypsum-based plaster, that (i) as a result of containing the same or greater levels of
strontium sulfide that has been found in drywall manufactured in the People’s Republic of China and imported into the United States between 2004 and 2007 is capable, when exposed to heat, humidity, or both, of releasing sulfur
dioxide, hydrogen sulfide, carbon disulfide, or other sulfur compounds into the air or (ii) has been designated by the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission as a product with a product defect that constitutes a substantial product
hazard within the meaning of § 15(a)(2) of the Consumer Product Safety Act (15 U.S.C. § 2064 (a)(2)).“Goods” means all real, personal or mixed property, tangible or intangible. For purposes of this chapter, intangible property
includes but shall not be limited to “computer information” and “informational rights” in computer information as defined in § 59.1-501.2.“Person” means any natural person, corporation, trust, partnership, association and any other
legal entity.“Services” includes but shall not be limited to (i) work performed in the business or occupation of the supplier, (ii) work performed for the supplier by an agent whose charges or costs for such work are transferred
by the supplier to the consumer or purchaser as an element of the consumer transaction, or (iii) the subject of an “access contract” as defined in § 59.1-501.2.“Supplier” means a seller, lessor, licensor, or professional who advertises,
solicits, or engages in consumer transactions, or a manufacturer, distributor, or licensor who advertises and sells, leases, or licenses goods or services to be resold, leased, or sublicensed by other persons in consumer transactions.

1.
The advertisement, sale, lease, license or offering for sale, lease or license, of goods or services to be used primarily for personal, family or household purposes;

2.
Transactions involving the advertisement, offer or sale to an individual of a business opportunity that requires both his expenditure of money or property and his personal services on a continuing basis and in which he has
not been previously engaged;

3.
Transactions involving the advertisement, offer or sale to an individual of goods or services relating to the individual’s finding or obtaining employment;

4.
A layaway agreement, whereby part or all of the price of goods is payable in one or more payments subsequent to the making of the layaway agreement and the supplier retains possession of the goods and bears the risk of their
loss or damage until the goods are paid in full according to the layaway agreement;

History.
1977, c. 635; 1981, c. 205; 1987, c. 464; 1988, c. 485; 1992, c. 278; 2001, cc. 741, 762; 2004, cc. 41, 90; 2009, cc. 359, 700; 2010, c. 143; 2011, c. 615; 2019, cc. 291, 292.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 741 substituted “license or offering for sale, lease or license” for “or offering for sale, or lease” in subdivision 1 of the paragraph defining “Consumer transaction”; added the last sentence in the paragraph defining “Goods”;
in the paragraph defining “Services,” substituted “(i) work” for “work (i),” substituted “(ii) work” for “or (ii),” and inserted “or (iii) the subject of an ‘access contract’ as defined in § 59.1-501.2”; and in the paragraph defining
“Supplier,” substituted “lessor or licensor” for “or lessor,” substituted “distributor or licensor” for “or distributor,” substituted “leases or licenses” for “or leases,” and substituted “leased or sublicensed” for “or leased.”

The 2001 amendment by c. 762 also added the last sentence in the paragraph defining “Goods.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by cc. 41 and 90 are identical, and added the paragraph defining “Cure offer.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 359 and 700 are identical, and inserted the definition of “Children’s product.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 143, in the definition of “Consumer transaction,” added subdivision 5 and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 615, effective March 25, 2011, and applicable to consumer transactions occurring on or after that date, added the definition for “Defective drywall.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 291 and 292 are identical, and added subdivision 6 in the definition of “Consumer transaction”; in the definition for “Supplier,” inserted “or professional”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For annual survey article discussing antitrust and trade regulation law, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2003).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 3.

§ 59.1-199.
Exclusions.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to:

Any aspect of a consumer transaction which aspect is authorized under laws or regulations of this Commonwealth or the United States, or the formal advisory opinions of any regulatory body or official of this Commonwealth or the United States.

Acts done by the publisher, owner, agent or employee of a newspaper, periodical, or radio or television station, or other advertising media such as outdoor advertising and advertising agencies, in the publication or dissemination of an advertisement in
violation of § 59.1-200, unless it be proved that such person knew that the advertisement was of a character prohibited by § 59.1-200.

Those aspects of a consumer transaction which are regulated by the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.

Banks, savings institutions, credit unions, small loan companies, public service corporations, mortgage lenders as defined in §

6.2-1600

, broker-dealers as defined in §

13.1-501

, gas suppliers as defined in subsection E of § 56-235.8, and insurance companies regulated and supervised by the State Corporation Commission or a comparable federal regulating body.

Any aspect of a consumer transaction which is subject to the Virginia Residential Landlord and Tenant Act (§

55.1-1200

et seq.) or Chapter 14 (§

55.1-1400

et seq.) of Title 55.1, unless the act or practice of a landlord constitutes a misrepresentation or fraudulent act or practice under § 59.1-200.

Real estate licensees who are licensed under Chapter 21 (§

54.1-2100

et seq.) of Title 54.1.

History.
1977, c. 635; 1987, c. 464; 1994, c. 400; 1995, c. 703; 1996, cc. 61, 77, 179; 1999, c. 494; 2000, cc. 691, 706.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1999, c. 494, cl. 3 which had provided that the provisions of c. 494 would expire July 1, 2000, was repealed by Acts 2000, cc. 691 and 706, cl. 3.

In subsection D, “§

6.2-1600

” was substituted for “§ 6.1-409,” effective October 1, 2010, to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “the Virginia Residential Landlord and Tenant Act (§

55.1-1200

et seq.) or Chapter 14 (§

55.1-1400

et seq.) of Title 55.1” for “the Landlord and Tenant Act, Chapter 13 (§ 55-217 et seq.) of Title 55 or the Virginia Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, Chapter 13.2 (§ 55-248.2 et seq.) of Title 55.”

§ 59.1-200.
Prohibited practices.

The following fraudulent acts or practices committed by a supplier in connection with a consumer transaction are hereby declared unlawful:

Misrepresenting goods or services as those of another;

Misrepresenting the source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods or services;

Misrepresenting the affiliation, connection, or association of the supplier, or of the goods or services, with another;

Misrepresenting geographic origin in connection with goods or services;

Misrepresenting that goods or services have certain quantities, characteristics, ingredients, uses, or benefits;

Misrepresenting that goods or services are of a particular standard, quality, grade, style, or model;

Advertising or offering for sale goods that are used, secondhand, repossessed, defective, blemished, deteriorated, or reconditioned, or that are “seconds,” irregulars, imperfects, or “not first class,” without clearly and unequivocally indicating in the
advertisement or offer for sale that the goods are used, secondhand, repossessed, defective, blemished, deteriorated, reconditioned, or are “seconds,” irregulars, imperfects or “not first class”;

Advertising goods or services with intent not to sell them as advertised, or with intent not to sell at the price or upon the terms advertised. In any action brought under this subdivision, the refusal by any person, or any employee, agent, or servant
thereof, to sell any goods or services advertised or offered for sale at the price or upon the terms advertised or offered, shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of this subdivision. This paragraph shall not apply
when it is clearly and conspicuously stated in the advertisement or offer by which such goods or services are advertised or offered for sale, that the supplier or offeror has a limited quantity or amount of such goods or
services for sale, and the supplier or offeror at the time of such advertisement or offer did in fact have or reasonably expected to have at least such quantity or amount for sale;

Making false or misleading statements of fact concerning the reasons for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions;

Misrepresenting that repairs, alterations, modifications, or services have been performed or parts installed;

Misrepresenting by the use of any written or documentary material that appears to be an invoice or bill for merchandise or services previously ordered;

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, using in any manner the words “wholesale,” “wholesaler,” “factory,” or “manufacturer” in the supplier’s name, or to describe the nature of the supplier’s business, unless the supplier is actually engaged primarily
in selling at wholesale or in manufacturing the goods or services advertised or offered for sale;

Using in any contract or lease any liquidated damage clause, penalty clause, or waiver of defense, or attempting to collect any liquidated damages or penalties under any clause, waiver, damages, or penalties that are void or unenforceable under any otherwise
applicable laws of the Commonwealth, or under federal statutes or regulations;

Using any other deception, fraud, false pretense, false promise, or misrepresentation in connection with a consumer transaction;

Violating any provision of § 3.2-6509, 3.2-6512, 3.2-6513, 3.2-6513.1, 3.2-6514, 3.2-6515, 3.2-6516, or 3.2-6519 is a violation of this chapter;

Failing to disclose all conditions, charges, or fees relating to:

The return of goods for refund, exchange, or credit. Such disclosure shall be by means of a sign attached to the goods, or placed in a conspicuous public area of the premises of the supplier, so as to be readily noticeable and readable by the person obtaining
the goods from the supplier. If the supplier does not permit a refund, exchange, or credit for return, he shall so state on a similar sign. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any retail merchant
who has a policy of providing, for a period of not less than 20 days after date of purchase, a cash refund or credit to the purchaser’s credit card account for the return of defective, unused, or undamaged merchandise
upon presentation of proof of purchase. In the case of merchandise paid for by check, the purchase shall be treated as a cash purchase and any refund may be delayed for a period of 10 banking days to allow for the
check to clear. This subdivision does not apply to sale merchandise that is obviously distressed, out of date, post season, or otherwise reduced for clearance; nor does this subdivision apply to special order purchases
where the purchaser has requested the supplier to order merchandise of a specific or unusual size, color, or brand not ordinarily carried in the store or the store’s catalog; nor shall this subdivision apply in
connection with a transaction for the sale or lease of motor vehicles, farm tractors, or motorcycles as defined in §

46.2-100

;

A layaway agreement. Such disclosure shall be furnished to the consumer (i) in writing at the time of the layaway agreement, or (ii) by means of a sign placed in a conspicuous public area of the premises of the supplier, so as to be readily noticeable
and readable by the consumer, or (iii) on the bill of sale. Disclosure shall include the conditions, charges, or fees in the event that a consumer breaches the agreement;

Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate or make unenforceable any contract or lease solely by reason of the failure of such contract or lease to comply with any other law of the Commonwealth or any federal statute or regulation, to the
extent such other law, statute, or regulation provides that a violation of such law, statute, or regulation shall not invalidate or make unenforceable such contract or lease.

13a.
Failing to provide to a consumer, or failing to use or include in any written document or material provided to or executed by a consumer, in connection with a consumer transaction any statement, disclosure, notice, or other
information however characterized when the supplier is required by 16 C.F.R. Part 433 to so provide, use, or include the statement, disclosure, notice, or other information in connection with the consumer transaction;

16a.
Failing to provide written notice to a consumer of an existing open-end credit balance in excess of $5 (i) on an account maintained by the supplier and (ii) resulting from such consumer’s overpayment on such account. Suppliers
shall give consumers written notice of such credit balances within 60 days of receiving overpayments. If the credit balance information is incorporated into statements of account furnished consumers by suppliers within such 60-day
period, no separate or additional notice is required;

17.
If a supplier enters into a written agreement with a consumer to resolve a dispute that arises in connection with a consumer transaction, failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of such an agreement;

18.
Violating any provision of the Virginia Health Club Act, Chapter 24 (§ 59.1-294 et seq.);

19.
Violating any provision of the Virginia Home Solicitation Sales Act, Chapter 2.1 (§ 59.1-21.1 et seq.);

20.
Violating any provision of the Automobile Repair Facilities Act, Chapter 17.1 (§ 59.1-207.1 et seq.);

21.
Violating any provision of the Virginia Lease-Purchase Agreement Act, Chapter 17.4 (§ 59.1-207.17 et seq.);

22.
Violating any provision of the Prizes and Gifts Act, Chapter 31 (§ 59.1-415 et seq.);

23.
Violating any provision of the Virginia Public Telephone Information Act, Chapter 32 (§ 59.1-424 et seq.);

24. Violating any provision of §

54.1-1505

;

25.
Violating any provision of the Motor Vehicle Manufacturers’ Warranty Adjustment Act, Chapter 17.6 (§ 59.1-207.34 et seq.);

26.
Violating any provision of § 3.2-5627, relating to the pricing of merchandise;

27.
Violating any provision of the Pay-Per-Call Services Act, Chapter 33 (§ 59.1-429 et seq.);

28.
Violating any provision of the Extended Service Contract Act, Chapter 34 (§ 59.1-435 et seq.);

29.
Violating any provision of the Virginia Membership Camping Act, Chapter 25 (§ 59.1-311 et seq.);

30.
Violating any provision of the Comparison Price Advertising Act, Chapter 17.7 (§ 59.1-207.40 et seq.);

31.
Violating any provision of the Virginia Travel Club Act, Chapter 36 (§ 59.1-445 et seq.);

32. Violating any provision of §§

46.2-1231

and

46.2-1233.1

;

33. Violating any provision of Chapter 40 (§

54.1-4000

et seq.) of Title 54.1;

34. Violating any provision of Chapter 10.1 (§

58.1-1031

et seq.) of Title 58.1;

35.
Using the consumer’s social security number as the consumer’s account number with the supplier, if the consumer has requested in writing that the supplier use an alternate number not associated with the consumer’s social
security number;

36. Violating any provision of Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.) of Title 6.2;

37. Violating any provision of §

8.01-40.2

;

38. Violating any provision of Article 7 (§

32.1-212

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 32.1;

39.
Violating any provision of Chapter 34.1 (§ 59.1-441.1 et seq.);

40. Violating any provision of Chapter 20 (§

6.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 6.2;

41.
Violating any provision of the Virginia Post-Disaster Anti-Price Gouging Act, Chapter 46 (§ 59.1-525 et seq.);

42.
Violating any provision of Chapter 47 (§ 59.1-530 et seq.);

43.
Violating any provision of § 59.1-443.2;

44.
Violating any provision of Chapter 48 (§ 59.1-533 et seq.);

45. Violating any provision of Chapter 25 (§

6.2-2500

et seq.) of Title 6.2;

46. Violating the provisions of clause (i) of subsection B of §

54.1-1115

;

47. Violating any provision of §

18.2-239

;

48.
Violating any provision of Chapter 26 (§ 59.1-336 et seq.);

49.
Selling, offering for sale, or manufacturing for sale a children’s product the supplier knows or has reason to know was recalled by the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission. There is a rebuttable presumption that a supplier
has reason to know a children’s product was recalled if notice of the recall has been posted continuously at least 30 days before the sale, offer for sale, or manufacturing for sale on the website of the U.S. Consumer Product Safety
Commission. This prohibition does not apply to children’s products that are used, secondhand or “seconds”;

50.
Violating any provision of Chapter 44.1 (§ 59.1-518.1 et seq.);

51. Violating any provision of Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 6.2;

52. Violating any provision of §

8.2-317.1

;

53. Violating subsection A of §

9.1-149.1

;

54.
Selling, offering for sale, or using in the construction, remodeling, or repair of any residential dwelling in the Commonwealth, any drywall that the supplier knows or has reason to know is defective drywall. This subdivision
shall not apply to the sale or offering for sale of any building or structure in which defective drywall has been permanently installed or affixed;

55. Engaging in fraudulent or improper or dishonest conduct as defined in §

54.1-1118

while engaged in a transaction that was initiated (i) during a declared state of emergency as defined in § 44-146.16 or (ii) to repair damage resulting from the event that prompted the declaration of a state of emergency,
regardless of whether the supplier is licensed as a contractor in the Commonwealth pursuant to Chapter 11 (§

54.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 54.1;

56.
Violating any provision of Chapter 33.1 (§ 59.1-434.1 et seq.);

57. Violating any provision of §

18.2-178

,

18.2-178.1

, or

18.2-200.1

;

58.
Violating any provision of Chapter 17.8 (§ 59.1-207.45 et seq.);

59. Violating any provision of subsection E of §

32.1-126

;

60. Violating any provision of §

54.1-111

relating to the unlicensed practice of a profession licensed under Chapter 11 (§

54.1-1100

et seq.) or Chapter 21 (§

54.1-2100

et seq.) of Title 54.1;

61. Violating any provision of §

2.2-2001.5

;

62. Violating any provision of Chapter 5.2 (§

54.1-526

et seq.) of Title 54.1;

63. Violating any provision of §

6.2-312

;

64. Violating any provision of Chapter 20.1 (§

6.2-2026

et seq.) of Title 6.2;

65. Violating any provision of Chapter 26 (§

6.2-2600

et seq.) of Title 6.2;

66.
Violating any provision of Chapter 54 (§ 59.1-586 et seq.);

67. Knowingly violating any provision of §

8.01-27.5

;

68.
Failing to make available a conspicuous online option to cancel a recurring purchase of a good or service as required by § 59.1-207.46;

69. Selling or offering for sale to a person younger than 21 years of age any substance intended for human consumption, orally or by inhalation, that contains tetrahydrocannabinol. This subdivision shall not (i) apply to products that are approved for
marketing by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and scheduled in the Drug Control Act (§

54.1-3400

et seq.) or (ii) be construed to prohibit any conduct permitted under Article 4.2 of Chapter 34 of Title 54.1 of the Code of Virginia;

70. Selling or offering for sale any substance intended for human consumption, orally or by inhalation, that contains tetrahydrocannabinol, unless such substance is (i) contained in child-resistant packaging, as defined in §

4.1-600

; (ii) equipped with a label that states, in English and in a font no less than 1/16 of an inch, (a) that the substance contains tetrahydrocannabinol and may not be sold to persons younger than 21 years of age, (b) all
ingredients contained in the substance, (c) the amount of such substance that constitutes a single serving, and (d) the total percentage and milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol included in the substance and the number of milligrams
of tetrahydrocannabinol that are contained in each serving; and (iii) accompanied by a certificate of analysis, produced by an independent laboratory that is accredited pursuant to standard ISO/IEC 17025 of the International Organization
of Standardization by a third-party accrediting body, that states the tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of the substance or the tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of the batch from which the substance originates. This subdivision
shall not (i) apply to products that are approved for marketing by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and scheduled in the Drug Control Act (§

54.1-3400

et seq.) or (ii) be construed to prohibit any conduct permitted under Article 4.2 of Chapter 34 of Title 54.1 of the Code of Virginia;

71.
Manufacturing, offering for sale at retail, or selling at retail an industrial hemp extract, as defined in § 3.2-5145.1, a food containing an industrial hemp extract, or a substance containing tetrahydrocannabinol that depicts
or is in the shape of a human, animal, vehicle, or fruit; and

72.
Selling or offering for sale any substance intended for human consumption, orally or by inhalation, that contains tetrahydrocannabinol and, without authorization, bears, is packaged in a container or wrapper that bears,
or is otherwise labeled to bear the trademark, trade name, famous mark as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 1125, or other identifying mark, imprint, or device, or any likeness thereof, of a manufacturer, processor, packer, or distributor of
a product intended for human consumption other than the manufacturer, processor, packer, or distributor that did in fact so manufacture, process, pack, or distribute such substance.

History.
1977, c. 635; 1979, c. 304; 1981, c. 205; 1983, c. 173; 1986, c. 432; 1987, cc. 462 to 464; 1988, cc. 24, 534; 1989, cc. 689, 703; 1990, c. 584; 1991, cc. 300, 605, 608, 630, 654; 1992, cc. 278, 545, 768; 1993, cc. 455,
760; 1994, cc. 261, 400, 655; 1995, c. 10; 1998, c. 848; 2000, cc. 880, 901; 2002, cc. 217, 897; 2003, cc. 800, 1003; 2004, cc. 784, 790, 798, 817; 2005, cc. 269, 303, 640, 861; 2006, c. 399; 2008, cc. 294, 791, 842; 2009, cc. 321,
359, 376, 699, 700; 2010, cc. 477, 713; 2011, c. 615; 2014, cc. 396, 459; 2016, c. 591; 2017, cc. 11, 16, 727; 2018, cc. 299, 704; 2019, cc. 291, 292, 521; 2020, cc. 412, 438, 481, 785, 1198, 1215, 1250, 1258; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c.
485; 2022, cc. 351, 5572022, , Sp. Sess. I, c. 2.

Cross references.

For provision that violations of Article 7 (§§

32.1-212

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 32.1, relating to bedding and upholstered furniture, constitute a prohibited practice under § 59.1-200 and are subject to the enforcement provisions of §§ 59.1-196 et seq., see §

32.1-226

.

As to investigating and restraining prohibited acts, related to qualified education loans, see §§

6.2-2620

,

6.2-2621

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 1003, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2003, c. 1003, cl. 3, provides: “That, in promulgating the regulations required by the second enactment clause, the Board of Health shall review the fees being charged for the services delivered by the Department of Health pursuant to Article 7 (
§

32.1-212

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of Title 32.1 as such services and fees were in effect prior to July 1, 2003, and shall revise such fees, as appropriate, consistent with the level of services required by this act.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, subdivision A 48 as added by Acts 2009, cc. 359 and 700 was renumbered as subdivision A 49. Subdivision A 48 as added by Acts 2009, c. 699 was renumbered as subdivision A 50. Also, Title 3.2 references
were substituted for Title 3.1 references to conform to Acts 2008, c. 860.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, subdivision A 51 as added by Acts 2010, c. 713, was renumbered as subdivision A 52. Title 6.1 references were changed to Title 6.2 references, effective October 1, 2010, to conform to recodification of
Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

Acts 2017, c. 727, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 704, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “( §

54.1-526

et seq.)” was substituted for “( § 54.1-519 et seq.)” in subdivision A 62 to conform to the renumbering of §§ 54.1-519 through 54.1-525, as added by Acts 2020, c. 481, to §§

54.1-526

through

54.1-542

.

Acts 2020, c. 481, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined
for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant
to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, c. 785, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 785, cl. 3 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall establish a procedure, to be in effect by March 1, 2021, for any person to apply, prior to July 1, 2021, for a license to be issued pursuant to Chapter 20.1 ( §

6.2-2026

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, when such chapter becomes effective. In addition, upon the effective date of the first enactment of this act, July 1, 2021, the State Corporation
Commission shall monitor settlements by all licensees, specifically looking at the number of settlements made pursuant to this act, the fees charged pursuant to §

6.2-2041

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and the principal amount to be paid by the consumer to satisfy the debt, and shall report to the Chairs of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Senate Committee
on Commerce and Labor by December 1 of each year 2023, 2024, 2025.”

Acts 2020, c. 785, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined
for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant
to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1198 and 1250, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 880 and 901 are identical, and deleted “and” at the end of subdivision A 32, and added “and” to subdivision A 33, and added subdivision A 34.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 217 deleted “and” at the end of subdivision A 33, added “and” at the end of subdivision A 34, and added subdivision A 35.

The 2002 amendment by c. 897 deleted “and” at the end of subdivision A 33, added “and” at the end of subdivision A 34, and added subdivision A 36.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 800 substituted “20” for “twenty” and “10” for “ten” in paragraph a of subdivision A 16, substituted “$5” for “five dollars,” “60” for “sixty” and “60-day” for “sixty-day” in subdivision A 16a, deleted “and” at the end of subdivision
A 35, added “and” at the end of subdivision A 36, and added subdivision A 37.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1003, substituted “that” for “which” in subdivisions A 7, A 11, A 13 and A 17 and in paragraph a of subdivision A 16; in subdivision A 13, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth”; in paragraph a of subdivision A
16, substituted “20” for “twenty” and “10” for “ten”; in subdivision A 16 a, substituted “$5” for “five dollars,” and twice substituted “60” for “sixty”; deleted “and” at the end of subdivision A 35; inserted “and” at the end of subdivision
A 36; and added present subdivision A 38.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 784 deleted “and” at the end of subdivision A 37; added “; and” at the end of subdivision A 38; and added subdivision A 39.

The 2004 amendment by c. 790 deleted “and” at the end of subdivision A 38; added “; and” at the end of subdivision A 39; and added subdivision A 40.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 798 and 817 are identical, and deleted “and” at the end of subdivision A 39; added “; and” at the end of subdivision A 40; and added subdivision A 41.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 269 and 303 are identical, and added subdivision A 42 and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 640 inserted subdivision A 43 and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 861 inserted subdivision A 44 and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 399, effective January 1, 2007, added subdivision A 45 and made related changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 294 added subdivision A 46; and made related changes.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 791 and 842 are identical, and added subdivision A 47 and made related changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 321 and 376 are identical, and added subdivision A 48 and made a related change.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 359 and 700 are identical, and added subdivision A 49 and made a related change.

The 2009 amendment by c. 699 added subdivision A 50 and made related changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 477, effective October 1, 2010, added subdivision A 51 and made related changes.

The 2010 amendment by c. 713 added subdivision A 51 and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 615, effective March 25, 2011, and applicable to consumer transactions occurring on or after that date, added subdivision A 53 and made a related change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 396 added subdivision A 53, redesignated former subdivision A 53 as A 54, and made related changes.

The 2014 amendment by c. 459 substituted “Club” for “Spa” in subdivision A 18.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 591 added subdivision A 13a.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 11 and 16 are identical, added subdivision A 55 and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2017 amendment by c. 727, effective January 1, 2018, added subdivision A 56 and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 299 added subdivision A 57 and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment by c. 704, effective January 1, 2019, added subdivision A 58 and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 291 and 292 are identical, and added subdivision A 59 and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment by c. 521 added subdivision A 60; and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 412 rewrote subdivision A 15, which read: “Violating any provision of § 3.2-6512, 3.2-6513, or 3.2-6516, relating to the sale of certain animals by pet dealers which is described in such sections, is a violation of this chapter.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 438 added subdivision A 61 and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 481 added subdivision A 61, which was subsequently redesignated as A 62 by the Virginia Code Commission, and made related changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 785, effective July 1, 2021, added subdivision A 61, which was subsequently redesignated as A 64 by the Virginia Code Commission, and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1198 and 1250, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added subdivision A 61, which was subsequently redesignated as A 65 by the Virginia Code Commission, and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258, effective January 1, 2021, are identical, and added subdivision A 61, which was subsequently redesignated as A 63 by the Virginia Code Commission, and made related changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 485, effective July 1, 2021, added subdivision A 66 and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 351 added subdivision A 67; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendment by c. 557, added subdivision A 67, renumbered subdivision A 68 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2022 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 2 added subdivisions A 67, A 68, A 69 and A 70.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 2; 4A M.J. Contracts, § 44.